District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-5902

Exemption of fraternal associations from provisions; licenses required for authorized solicitors; assignment of licenses; violations

Repealed.

History

April 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-227, § 16(b), 44 DCR 140

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 35-1301, 35-1302.

Editor's Notes

Former § 35-1301 was also amended by § 10(p) of D.C. Law 11-268, became effective on May 21, 1997. The amendment by D.C. Law 11-268, substituted “Commissioner of Insurance and Securities” for “Superintendent of Insurance of the District” in the first sentence.